apertium-lanc.lanc.dix
        <pardef n="dblT__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ts</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ted</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
        <pardef n="ma/ke__vblex">
        <e><p><l>ke</l><r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kes</l><r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>de</l><r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
            </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/et__vblex">
      <e><p><l>et</l><r>get<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ets</l><r>get<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ot</l><r>get<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
            <pardef n="g/etOld__vblex">
      <e><p><l>et</l><r>get<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ets</l><r>get<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>otten</l><r>get<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
            <pardef n="eat__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
                <pardef n="ate__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
        <pardef n="et/Old__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ten</l><r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

            <pardef n="t">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="t"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
            <pardef n="tmmood">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="tmmood"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="tsuch">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="tsuch"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="tout">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="tout"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tw">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="tw"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="tell">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="tell"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
        <pardef n="steadw">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="steadw"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
            <pardef n="the">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="tsuch"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="the"><i>the</i><par n="tout"/></e>
<e lm="himself"><i>himself</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="hissel"><i>hissel</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="herself"><i>herself</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="thou"><i>thou</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="us"><i>us</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="owt"><i>owt</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="nowt"><i>nowt</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="summat"><i>summat</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="tuther"><i>tuther</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="brosen"><i>brosen</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="a deal"><i>a<b/>deal</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="gradely"><i>gradely</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="puddled"><i>puddled</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="mickle"><i>mickle</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="smidgen"><i>smidgen</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="a mite"><i>a<b/>mite</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="owd"><i>owd</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="keck"><i>keck</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="cack-handed"><i>cack-handed</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="nay"><i>nay</i><par n="tell"/></e>
<e lm="aye"><i>aye</i><par n="tell"/></e>
<e lm="betwixt"><i>betwixt</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="make"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skit"><i>skit</i><par n="dblT__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="get"><i>g</i><par n="g/etOld__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="et"><i>et</i><par n="et/Old__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="et"><i>et</i><par n="et/Old__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mun"><i>mun</i><par n="tmmood"/></e>
<e lm="happen"><i>happen</i><par n="tmmood"/></e>
<e lm="marry"><i>marry</i><par n="tmmood"/></e>
<e lm="in the family way"><i>in<b/>the<b/>family<b/>way</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="banging"><i>banging</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="bawtry"><i>bawtry</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="beholden"><i>beholden</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="bonny"><i>bonny</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="breet"><i>breet</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="cant"><i>cant</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="crony"><i>crony</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="doesum"><i>doesum</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="dolly"><i>dolly</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="endways"><i>endways</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="forrud"><i>forrud</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="eiron"><i>eiron</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="feaw"><i>feaw</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="hacklt"><i>hacklt</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="muzzy"><i>muzzy</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="spare"><i>spare</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="strike of day"><i>strike<b/>of<b/>day</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="varment"><i>varment</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="warlock"><i>warlock</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="editch"><i>editch</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="for"><i>for</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="abaht"><i>abaht</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="naar"><i>naar</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="awbut"><i>awbut</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="weer"><i>weer</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="'cose"><i>'cose</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="eaware"><i>eaware</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="make"><i>make</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mysen"><i>mysen</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="us"><i>us</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="yon"><i>yon</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="gormless"><i>gormless</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="fain"><i>fain</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="wi"><i>wi</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="until"><i>until</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
